Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 11
MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION
OPTIONS FUNDING

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-001, see section 1 of chapter 353, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

43-4-1101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that it is necessary, appropriate, and in the best interest of the state to use a portion of the general fund money that is dedicated for transportation purposes pursuant to section 24-75-219 to fund multimodal transportation projects and operations throughout the state and to use a portion of the money that is generated by the retail delivery fee imposed on the delivery of retail goods transported to the delivery site by motor vehicle pursuant to section 43-4-218 (3) to fund transportation-related greenhouse gas mitigation expenses throughout the state as authorized by this part 11 because, in addition to the general benefits that it provides to all Coloradans, a complete and integrated multimodal transportation system that includes greenhouse gas mitigation projects and services:

Benefits seniors by making aging in place more feasible for them;

Benefits residents of communities, in rural and disproportionately impacted communities, by providing them with more accessible and flexible public transportation services;

Provides enhanced mobility for persons with disabilities;

Provides safe routes to schools for children; and

Reduces emissions of air pollutants, including hazardous air pollutants and greenhouse gases, that contribute to adverse environmental effects, including but not limited to climate change, and adverse human health effects.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire part added, (SB 18-001), ch. 353, p. 2106, § 12, effective May 31.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1448, § 49, effective June 17.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

43-4-1102. Definitions.

As used in this part 11, unless the context otherwise requires:

Repealed.

"Commission" means the transportation commission created in section 43-1-106 (1).

"Department" means the department of transportation.

"Fund" means the multimodal transportation and mitigation options fund created in section 43-4-1103 (1)(a).

(4.5) "Greenhouse gas mitigation project" means a project that helps achieve compliance with federal or state laws or rules that regulate transportation-related greenhouse gas emissions by reducing vehicle miles traveled or increasing multimodal travel.

"Multimodal projects" means capital or operating costs for fixed route and on-demand transit, transportation demand management programs, multimodal mobility projects enabled by new technology, multimodal transportation studies, modeling tools, greenhouse gas mitigation projects, and bicycle or pedestrian projects.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire part added, (SB 18-001), ch. 353, p. 2107, § 12, effective May 31.

L. 2021:

(1) repealed, (4) and (5) amended, and (4.5) added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1448, § 50, effective June 17.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

43-4-1103. Multimodal transportation options fund - creation - revenue sources for fund - use of fund.

The multimodal transportation and mitigation options fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of money transferred from the general fund to the fund pursuant to section 24-75-219, retail delivery fee revenue credited to the fund pursuant to section 43-4-218 (5)(a)(II), and any other money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund.

Repealed.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2)(a)(IV) and (2)(d) of this section, subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, money must be expended from the fund as follows:
(2) (a) (I) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2)(a)(IV) and (2)(d) of this section, subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, money must be expended from the fund as follows:

Eighty-five percent to the commission for local multimodal projects; and

Fifteen percent to the commission for state multimodal projects that are selected by the commission.

and (III) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2021.)

(IV) (A) On July 1, 2021, the state treasurer shall transfer twelve million dollars from the fund to the fund created in section 43-4-1002 for the purpose of providing additional funding for the Southwest Chief La Junta route restoration program.

(B) On February 15, 2022, the state treasurer shall transfer two million five hundred thousand dollars to the fund created in section 43-4-1002.

Repealed.

With respect to the distributions of money for local multimodal projects required by subsection (2)(a)(I)(A) of this section, the commission shall establish a formula for disbursement of the amount allocated for local multimodal projects, based on population and transit ridership and other criteria developed in consultation with the transportation advisory committee created in section 43-1-1104, the transit and rail advisory committee of the department, the state transportation advisory committee of the department, transit advocacy organizations, and bicycle and pedestrian advocacy organizations. Recipients shall provide a match equal to the amount of the award; except that the commission may create a formula for reducing or exempting the match requirement for local governments or agencies due to their size or any other special circumstances and may also, if recommended by department staff, reduce or exempt any individual recipient from the match requirement for a specific project.

On and after October 1, 2022, unless the department has both adopted implementing guidelines and procedures that satisfy the requirements of section 43-1-128 (3) and updated its ten-year vision plan to comply with the implementing guidelines and procedures, expenditures from the funds made available for multimodal projects pursuant to sections 24-75-219 (7)(c)(I) and (7)(f)(II) and 43-4-218 (5)(a)(II) for state multimodal projects shall only be made for multimodal projects that the department, in consultation with the department of public health and environment, determines will help bring the ten-year vision plan into compliance with the requirements of section 43-1-128 (3).

On and after October 1, 2022, unless the department has adopted implementing guidelines and procedures that satisfy the requirements of section 43-1-128 (3) and a metropolitan planning organization that is in an area or includes an area that has been out of attainment for national ambient air quality standards for ozone for two years or more has updated its regional transportation plan to comply with the implementing guidelines and procedures, expenditures from the funds made available for multimodal projects pursuant to sections 24-75-219 (7)(c)(I) and (7)(f)(II) and 43-4-218 (5)(a)(II) for local multimodal projects within the territory of the metropolitan planning organization shall only be made for multimodal projects that the department, in consultation with the department of public health and environment, determines will help bring the regional transportation plan into compliance with the requirements of section 43-1-128 (3).

The restrictions set forth in subsections (2)(d)(I) and (2)(d)(II) of this section apply until the department or an affected metropolitan planning organization updates its ten-year vision plan or regional transportation plan, as applicable, to comply with the implementing guidelines and procedures as required. Both the department and an affected metropolitan planning organization shall work diligently to achieve such compliance until it is achieved.

The department shall annually report to the transportation legislation review committee of the general assembly created in section 43-2-145 (1) regarding its expenditures from the fund including, at a minimum:

(I) An aggregate accounting of all money expended from the fund during the prior fiscal year; and

(II) A listing of all projects receiving funding from the fund during the prior fiscal year that includes for each project:

Identification of the entity receiving funding for the project;

The amount of funding provided for the project; and

The amount of local matching money provided for the project.

Each transportation planning region shall annually report to the department regarding the status of local multimodal projects within the region that have received funding from the fund.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a), the reporting requirement specified in subsection (3)(a) of this section continues indefinitely.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire part added, (SB 18-001), ch. 353, p. 2107, § 12, effective May 31.

L. 2019:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 19-263), ch. 334, p. 3087, § 7, effective May 29.

L. 2020:

IP(2)(a)(I) amended and (2)(a)(III) added, (HB 20-1381), ch. 171, p. 787, § 10, effective June 29.

L. 2021:

(1)(a), (2)(a) (see editor's note), (2)(c), IP(3)(a), (3)(a)(I), and IP(3)(a)(II) amended, (1)(b) and (2)(b) repealed, and (2)(d) and (3)(a.5) added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1449, § 51, effective June 17.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.